dictionaries/gl_ES/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 119 0 chevosllo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P3 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 119 0 chevosllos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P3 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 119 0 chevosnos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo / acusativo P5 + dativo / acusativo P4
SFX 119 0 chevosnola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 119 0 chevosnolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 119 0 chevosnolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 119 0 chevosnolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 119 0 chevoslles . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo / acusativo P5 + dativo P6
SFX 119 0 chevosllela . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 119 0 chevosllelas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 119 0 chevosllelo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 119 0 chevosllelos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 119 0 chelles . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6
SFX 119 0 chellela . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 119 0 chellelas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 119 0 chellelo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 119 0 chellelos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 119 0 chellesnos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo / acusativo P4
SFX 119 0 chellesnola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 119 0 chellesnolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 119 0 chellesnolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 119 0 chellesnolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 119 0 chellesvos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo / acusativo P5
SFX 119 0 chellesvola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 119 0 chellesvolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 119 0 chellesvolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 119 0 chellesvolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P6 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 119 0 lleme . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo solidariedade (P2) cortesía P3 + dativo / acusativo P1
SFX 119 0 llema . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo solidariedade (P2) cortesía P3 + dativo P1 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 119 0 llemas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo solidariedade (P2) cortesía P3 + dativo P1 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 119 0 llemo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo solidariedade (P2) cortesía P3 + dativo P1 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 119 0 llemos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo solidariedade (P2) cortesía P3 + dativo P1 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 119 0 llenos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo / acusativo P4
SFX 119 0 llenola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 119 0 llenolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 119 0 llenolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 119 0 llenolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 119 0 llevos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo / acusativo P5
SFX 119 0 llevola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 119 0 llevolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 119 0 llevolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 119 0 llevolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P3 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 119 s nola mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 119 s nolas mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 119 s nolo mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 119 s nolos mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 119 0 nola [^o]s . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 119 0 nolas [^o]s . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 119 0 nolo [^o]s . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 119 0 nolos [^o]s . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 119 0 nola [^s] . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 119 0 nolas [^s] . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 119 0 nolo [^s] . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 119 0 nolos [^s] . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 119 s noslle mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo / acusativo P4 + dativo P3
SFX 119 s noslla mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 119 s nosllas mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 119 s nosllo mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 119 s nosllos mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 119 s nosvos mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo / acusativo P4 + dativo / acusativo P5
SFX 119 s nosvola mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 119 s nosvolas mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 119 s nosvolo mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P5 transitiva dativo P4 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 masculino
